Maryland, session 2025, HB1344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Department of General Services shall:
(1) conduct an assessment of all facilities owned by the State and operated
by the 16 State agencies that the Department currently supports to evaluate whether the
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. hb1344*

HOUSE BILL 1344
facility or a portion of the facility would be suitable to lease to a child care center, as defined
in § 9.5–401 of the Education Article; and
(2) on or before December 1, 2026:
(i) report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the results of the assessment conducted under item (1) of
this section, including:
1. an inventory of all facilities owned by the State described
in item (1) of this section; and
2. a description of whether each facility:
A. is suitable to lease to a child care center; and
B. has availability to be leased by the State to a child care
center; and
(ii) publish the report on its website.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.